Maryland, session 2026, HB0214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
Title 15. [Public] Institutions of Higher Education.
15–141.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACADEMIC FORGIVENESS POLICY” MEANS A POLICY THAT
DISREGARDS DURING AN ADMISSIONS PROCESS AN APPLICANT’S UNSATISFACTORY
OR FAILING GRADES EARNED AT A PRIOR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(3) “ADMISSIONS PROCESS” MEANS THE PROCESS BY WHICH
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION SELECT STUDENTS FOR ENROLLMENT.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2026, EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT RECEIVES STATE FUNDS SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT AN
ACADEMIC FORGIVENESS POLICY.
(2) THE POLICY DEVELOPED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL APPLY TO AN APPLICANT IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT’S GRADES WERE EARNED 7 OR MORE
YEARS BEFORE THE APPLICANT’S APPLICATION SUBMISSION; AND
(II) THE APPLICANT ELECTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
ACADEMIC FORGIVENESS POLICY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.